Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,164
Alcoholic
liquor; implied consent to submit to chemical tests; refusal or failure; penalty;
officer; report.

(1) Any person who operates or
is in the actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle upon a highway
in this state shall be deemed to have given his or her consent to submit to
a chemical test or tests of his or her blood or breath for the purpose of
determining the amount of alcoholic content in his or her blood or breath.

(2) Any law enforcement officer who has been duly authorized
to make arrests for violations of traffic laws of this state or of ordinances
of any city or village who, after stopping or detaining the operator of any
commercial motor vehicle, has reasonable grounds to believe that the operator
was driving or in the actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle
while having any alcoholic liquor in his or her body may require such operator
to submit to a chemical test or tests of his or her blood or breath for the
purpose of determining the alcoholic content of such blood or breath.

(3) Any law enforcement officer who has been duly authorized
to make arrests for violations of traffic laws of this state or of ordinances
of any city or village may require any person who operates or has in his or
her actual physical control a commercial motor vehicle upon a highway in this
state to submit to a preliminary breath test of his or her breath for alcoholic
content if the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that such person
has any alcoholic liquor in his or her body, has committed a moving traffic
violation, or has been involved in a traffic accident. Any such person who
refuses to submit to a preliminary breath test shall be placed under arrest
and shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. Any person arrested for refusing
to submit to a preliminary breath test or any person who submits to a preliminary
breath test the results of which indicate the presence of any alcoholic liquor
in such person's body may, upon the direction of a law enforcement officer,
be required to submit to a chemical test or tests of his or her blood or breath
for a determination of the alcoholic content.

(4) Any person operating or in the actual physical control
of a commercial motor vehicle who submits to a chemical test or tests of his
or her blood or breath which discloses the presence of any alcoholic liquor
in his or her body shall be placed out of service for twenty-four hours by
the law enforcement officer.

(5) Any person operating or in the actual physical control
of a commercial motor vehicle who refuses to submit to a chemical test or
tests of his or her blood or breath or any person operating or in the actual
physical control of a commercial motor vehicle who submits to a chemical test
or tests of his or her blood or breath which discloses an alcoholic concentration
of: (a) Four-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per one hundred
milliliters of his or her blood or (b) four-hundredths of one gram or more
by weight of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of his or her breath shall
be placed out of service for twenty-four hours by the law enforcement officer,
and the officer shall forward to the director a sworn report. The director may accept a sworn report submitted electronically. The
report shall state that the person was operating or in the actual physical
control of a commercial motor vehicle, was requested to submit to the required
chemical test or tests, and refused to submit to the required chemical test
or tests or submitted to the required chemical test or tests and possessed
an alcohol concentration at or in excess of that specified by this subsection.

(6) Any person involved in a commercial motor vehicle accident
in this state may be required to submit to a chemical test or tests of his
or her blood or breath by any law enforcement officer if the officer has reasonable
grounds to believe that such person was driving or was in actual physical
control of a commercial motor vehicle on a highway in this state while under
the influence of alcoholic liquor at the time of the accident. A person involved
in a commercial motor vehicle accident subject to the implied consent law
of this state shall not be deemed to have withdrawn consent to submit to a
chemical test or tests of his or her blood or breath by reason of leaving
this state. If the person refuses a test or tests under this section and leaves
the state for any reason following an accident, he or she shall remain subject
to this section upon return.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 114;

Laws 1992, LB 872, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 191, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 323, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 31.